Utah statutes.
61-2b-18.   Application for licensure, certification, or registration --
Approval as an expert witness.
(1)  An application for the following shall be sent to the division on a form
approved by the division:
(a)  original certification, licensure, or registration;
(b)  approval as an expert witness; and
(c)  renewal of certification, licensure, or registration.
(2)  The payment of the appropriate fee, as established by the division, with
the concurrence of the board, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, must
accompany an application for:
(a)  approval as an expert witness;
(b)  original certification, licensure, or registration; and
(c)  renewal of certification, licensure, or registration.
(3)  At the time of filing an application described in Subsection (1), an
applicant shall:
(a)  sign a pledge to comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional
Appraisal Practice and the ethical rules to be observed by an appraiser that
are established under Section 61-2b-27 for:
(i)  a certified or licensed appraiser;
(ii)  a trainee; or
(iii)  an expert witness approved under this chapter; and
(b)  certify that the applicant understands the types of misconduct, as set
forth in this chapter, for which a disciplinary proceeding may be initiated
against a person certified, licensed, or registered under this chapter.
